Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Chapter 14

Local Economic Adjustment Act of 1975

9-14-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Local Economic Adjustment Act of 1975.”

Acts 1975, ch. 312, § 1; T.C.A., § 9-1501.

9-14-102. Purpose.

In order to promote the health, safety, right to gainful employment, economic opportunity and general welfare of the inhabitants of this state, the local governments (cities, towns and counties) are authorized to participate cooperatively with the state and federal governments in activities designed to alleviate or moderate existing or potential conditions of severe economic adjustment, resulting from termination or closure of major industries or firms, unemployment caused therefrom, and other hardships that would result in loss of the labor force, breakup of the family unit, and other conditions resulting from explosions, floods, earthquakes, or other major disasters, natural or man-made.

Acts 1975, ch. 312, § 2; T.C.A., § 9-1502.

9-14-103. Chapter definitions — Economic adjustment project.

For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Cities,” “towns” and “counties” mean those general government units that are political subdivisions of the state of Tennessee;

“Economic adjustment project” means those activities for which funds are available from local, state or federal sources and which include one (1) or more of the following objectives:

Plan, finance, construct, operate and maintain all types of public facilities, including publicly owned industrial parks;

Make commercial loans for business and industrial development;

Do economic development planning, including research and technical assistance studies related to accelerating the development process;

Provide public service jobs;

Provide rent supplements to families and individuals, including loans and grants;

Provide mortgage payment assistance to families and individuals, including loans and grants;

Provide for costs of relocation of families and individuals, including loans and grants;

Provide vocational and technical training in cooperation with the state's system of vocational and technical schools; and

Provide other appropriate assistance related to economic adjustment and the purposes of this chapter;

“Federal government” means the government of the United States and any agency, department, board or commission thereof performing or administering programs enacted by statute; and

“State” means the state of Tennessee, including all state agencies, departments, boards, commissions, and other bodies which carry out state functions and programs. “State” also includes development districts as created by title 13, chapter 14.

Acts 1975, ch. 312, § 3; T.C.A., § 9-1503.

9-14-104. Loans and grants authorized.

Cities and counties are authorized to accept grants from the federal government to carry out economic adjustment projects. Cities and counties are also authorized to enter into contractual agreements with the federal government and with state government to accept grants and disburse or redistribute funds for purposes of economic adjustment projects, such disbursements to be in the form of grants and loans. No grant, however, shall be made to a private profit-making entity. Grants or loans can be made to a private or public nonprofit organization or association.

Loans for commercial and industrial development purposes shall be legally binding obligations and shall require interest payments and shall be consummated in accordance with applicable state and federal statutes and regulations. Commercial loans can be made only for legal purposes and subject to safeguards to protect the public interest, and can be made in conjunction with another commercial lender, a federal agency, and a state industrial development authority. Commercial loans made under this chapter can be first, second or third mortgage loans. The claim and right for principal repayment on second and third mortgage loans shall be secondary and subordinate to the first mortgage loan, except that repayment of principal and interest shall be made and prorated concurrently as agreed among the several lenders. In cases of foreclosure and acquisition of assets for liquidation or resale, the claim and right of the city or county shall be in a first, second or third mortgage position, as appropriate and as agreed to.

Loans made for public facilities, the repayment of which extends more than five (5) years, shall be in the form of municipal bonds, subject to the bond provisions and procedures spelled out by state enabling statutes for cities, counties and other political subdivisions. Loans made for less than five (5) years may be at a reduced interest cost, but not less than two percent (2%), simple interest.

Acts 1975, ch. 312, § 4; T.C.A., § 9-1504.

Cross-References. Authority of counties to receive and disburse grants, loans and funds from state and federal governments, §5-8-108.

9-14-105. City and county economic adjustment departments.

Cities and counties, singly or jointly by contract with each other or with state government, in initiating an economic adjustment project or program, shall create a department within the local government to carry out such projects or programs over a multi-year period. Such department shall be staffed by competent professionals, and headed by a director responsible to the local government as determined by ordinance, resolution or contract agreement.

Acts 1975, ch. 312, § 5; T.C.A., § 9-1505.

9-14-106. Funds.

Cities and counties are specifically authorized to appropriate funds from local sources, from general funds available, and from any other source authorized by state law, to operate the department and otherwise manage an economic adjustment project as described in this chapter, including the provision of funds needed to match available state and federal funds for such purposes. Commercial loans made to individuals, private firms and corporations shall in no way extend the credit of cities and counties in behalf thereof; however, such loans can be made in behalf of the federal government and with use of federal funds granted for such purposes.

Acts 1975, ch. 312, § 6; T.C.A., § 9-1506.

9-14-107. Record of activities and finances.

Appropriate financial and other records shall be kept on all transactions, which will show at all times activities planned, in progress and completed, the cost of each activity, the operational costs, and other such information as may be required to protect the public interest. An annual financial audit of the department shall be made by the comptroller of the treasury as provided by §9-3-211. All records shall be open for public inspection during regular working hours. All audits performed by the internal audit staff of the department shall be conducted in accordance with the standards established by the comptroller of the treasury pursuant to §4-3-304(9).

Acts 1975, ch. 312, § 7; T.C.A., § 9-1507; Acts 1984, ch. 794, § 6.

9-14-108. Construction of chapter.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate its purposes.

Acts 1975, ch. 312, § 8; T.C.A., § 9-1508.